District of Columbia statutes.
38-705

Sale or exchange authorized.

The Board of Education, in its discretion, is authorized to make exchange or to sell books or other educational supplies which are no longer desired for school use.

Jan. 31, 1930, 46 Stat. 62, ch. 32, § 5
1981 Ed., § 31-705.
1973 Ed., § 31-405.